District of Columbia statutes.
42-3209

Recovery of real and personal property leased together.

Whenever real and personal property are leased together, as, for example, a house with furniture contained therein, the landlord, either in an action of ejectment or in the summary proceeding for possession, in the Superior Court of the District of Columbia, may have a judgment for recovery of the personalty as well as the realty.

Mar. 3, 1901, 31 Stat. 1384, ch. 854, § 1235
Feb. 17, 1909, 35 Stat. 623, ch. 134
July 8, 1963, 77 Stat. 77, Pub. L. 88-60, § 1
July 29, 1970, 84 Stat. 588, Pub. L. 91-358, title I, § 167(1)
Possessory actions, see § 16-1501 et seq.
1981 Ed., § 45-1409.
1973 Ed., § 45-909.